lexc-files/inflections/verb/verb-infl_a-i-u.txt
!=======================================
LEXICON VerbInflI
!  for verb roots that end in -a, -i, -u
!=======================================

!~~~~~~~~~~~~
! indicative
!~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Ind.Intr]:^%{G%}u  IntrInd;
^[Ind.Trns]:^%{G%}a  TrnsInd;

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! participial
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Ptcp.Intr]:^lghii  IntrPtcp;
^[Ptcp.Trns]:^ke     TrnsPtcp;
!^[Ptcp.Intr]:^ka     IntrPtcpAlternate; ! second participial mood?
!^[Ptcp.Trns]:^ka     TrnsPtcpAlternate; ! ^[Jacobson (2001) p.73]

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! interrogative 
!   exhibits some fusional properties
!   so the full paradigms are given here
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
!-----------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|---------------------------------|
^[Intrg.Intr]^[3Sg]:^%{G%}a^0     Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Intr]^[1Sg]:^zi^nga  Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Intr.2Sg]:^zin  Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Intr]^[3Pl]:^%{G%}a^t     Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Intr]^[1Pl]:^ste^a   Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Intr.2Pl]:^tsi  Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Intr]^[3Du]:^%{G%}a^k     Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Intr]^[1Du]:^ste^ung Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Intr.2Du]:^stek Enclitic;
!-----------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|---------------------------------|

!---------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.3Sg]:^%{G%}a^gu    Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.3Pl]:^a^ki      Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.3Du]:^a^kek      Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.3Sg]:^%{G%}a^tgu   Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.3Pl]:^a^tki     Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.3Du]:^a^tkek     Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.3Sg]:^%{G%}a^gnegu Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.3Pl]:^a^gneki   Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.3Du]:^a^gnekek   Enclitic;
!---------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Sg.3Sg]:^zi^kun       Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Sg.3Pl]:^zi^ngi    Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Sg.3Du]:^zi^gngek   Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Pl.3Sg]:^ste^ggu      Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Pl.3Pl]:^ste^ki    Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Pl.3Du]:^ste^kek    Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Du.3Sg]:^ste^gnegu    Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Du.3Pl]:^ste^gneki Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Du.3Du]:^ste^gnekek Enclitic;
!---------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Sg.3Sg]:^zi^gu        Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Sg.3Pl]:^zi^ki     Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Sg.3Du]:^zi^kek     Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Pl.3Sg]:^0^ggu        Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Pl.3Pl]:^0^ki      Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Pl.3Du]:^0^kek      Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Du.3Sg]:^0^gnegu      Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Du.3Pl]:^0^gneki   Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Du.3Du]:^0^gnekek   Enclitic;
!---------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.1Sg]:^a^nga        Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.1Pl]:^i^nkut    Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.1Du]:^i^nkung    Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.1Sg]:^a^tnga       Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.1Pl]:^i^nkut    Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.1Du]:^i^nkung    Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.1Sg]:^a^gnenga     Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.1Pl]:^i^nkut    Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.1Du]:^i^nkung    Enclitic;
!---------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
! no ^[1--.1--] forms                                                                                                                    |
!---------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Sg.1Sg]:^zi^nga       Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Sg.1Pl]:^zi^kut    Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Sg.1Du]:^zi^kung    Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Pl.1Sg]:^0^ngnga      Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Pl.1Pl]:^0^kut     Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Pl.1Du]:^0^kung     Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Du.1Sg]:^0^gnenga     Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Du.1Pl]:^0^gneku   Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Du.1Du]:^0^gnekung  Enclitic;
!---------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.2Sg]:^a^ten        Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.2Pl]:^i^si      Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.2Du]:^i^stek     Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.2Sg]:^a^ten        Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.2Pl]:^i^si      Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.2Du]:^i^stek     Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.2Sg]:^a^ten        Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.2Pl]:^i^si      Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.2Du]:^i^stek     Enclitic;
!---------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Sg.2Sg]:^zi^ken       Enclitic;                                            |                                             |
^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Pl.2Sg]:^ste^ken      Enclitic;                                            |                                             |
^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Du.2Sg]:^ste^ken      Enclitic;                                            |                                             |
!---------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
! no ^[2--.2--] forms                                                                                                                    |
!---------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! present optative 
!   exhibits some fusional properties
!   so the full paradigms are given here
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
!----------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Pres.Intr]^[3Sg]:^li^0     Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Intr]^[1Sg]:^la^nga  Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Intr.2Sg]:^%{GI%}  Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Intr]^[3Pl]:^li^t     Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Intr]^[1Pl]:^lte^a   Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Intr]^[2Pl]:^te^k  Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Intr]^[3Du]:^li^k     Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Intr]^[1Du]:^lte^ung Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Intr]^[2Du]:^te^k  Enclitic;
!----------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|

!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.3Sg]:^li^gu     Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.3Pl]:^li^ki     Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.3Du]:^li^kek     Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.3Sg]:^li^tgu    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.3Pl]:^li^tki    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.3Du]:^li^tkek    Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.3Sg]:^li^gnegu  Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.3Pl]:^li^gneki  Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.3Du]:^li^gnekek  Enclitic;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Sg.3Sg]:^la^kun    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Sg.3Pl]:^la^ngi    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Sg.3Du]:^la^ngak    Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Pl.3Sg]:^lte^ggu   Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Pl.3Pl]:^lte^ki    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Pl.3Du]:^lte^kek    Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Du.3Sg]:^lte^gnegu Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Du.3Pl]:^lte^gneki Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Du.3Du]:^lte^gnekek Enclitic;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Pres.Trns.2Sg.3Sg]:^gu          Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Sg.3Pl]:^0^ki      Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Sg.3Du]:^0^kek      Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Pl.3Sg]:^te^ggu    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Pl.3Pl]:^te^ki     Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Pl.3Du]:^te^kek     Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Du.3Sg]:^te^gnegu  Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Du.3Pl]:^te^gneki  Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Du.3Du]:^te^gnekek  Enclitic;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.1Sg]:^li^nga    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.1Pl]:^li^kut    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.1Du]:^li^kung    Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.1Sg]:^li^tnga   Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.1Pl]:^li^nkut   Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.1Du]:^li^nkung   Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.1Sg]:^li^gnenga Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.1Pl]:^li^nkut   Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.1Du]:^li^nkung   Enclitic;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
! no ^[1--.1--] forms                                                                                                                          |
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Sg.1Sg]:^0^nga     Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Sg.1Pl]:^0^kut     Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Sg.1Du]:^0^kung     Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Pl.1Sg]:^te^ngnga  Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Pl.1Pl]:^te^kut    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Pl.1Du]:^te^kung    Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Du.1Sg]:^te^gnenga Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Du.1Pl]:^te^gnekut Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Du.1Du]:^te^gnekung Enclitic;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.2Sg]:^la^ten    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.2Pl]:^li^si     Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.2Du]:^li^stek    Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.2Sg]:^la^ten    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.2Pl]:^li^si     Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.2Du]:^li^stek    Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.2Sg]:^la^ten    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.2Pl]:^li^si     Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.2Du]:^li^stek    Enclitic;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Sg.2Sg]:^la^ken    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Sg.2Pl]:^la^msi    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Sg.2Du]:^la^mtek    Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Pl.2Sg]:^la^ken    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Pl.2Pl]:^la^msi    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Pl.2Du]:^la^mtek    Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Du.2Sg]:^la^ken    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Du.2Pl]:^la^msi    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Du.2Du]:^la^mtek    Enclitic;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|
! no ^[2--.2--] forms                                                                                                                          |
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! negative present optative
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Opt.Neg.Pres.Intr]:^fqaa  IntrOptNEG;
^[Opt.Neg.Pres.Trns]:^fqaa  TrnsOptNEG;

!--------------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Neg.Pres.Trns.2Sg.3Pl]:^fqiita Enclitic;
^[Opt.Neg.Pres.Trns.2Pl.3Pl]:^fqiita Enclitic;
^[Opt.Neg.Pres.Trns.2Du.3Pl]:^fqiita Enclitic;
!--------------------------------------------|

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! future optative
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Opt.Fut.Intr]:^lgha  IntrOptFut;
^[Opt.Fut.Trns]:^nake  TrnsOptFut;

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
